Utah statutes.
63I-2-248.   Repeal dates -- Title 48.

(1)  Title 48, Chapter 1, General and Limited Liability Partnerships, is repealed January 1, 2016.

(2)  Title 48, Chapter 2a, Utah Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act, is repealed January 1, 2016.

(3)  Title 48, Chapter 2c, Utah Revised Limited Liability Company Act, is repealed January 1, 2016.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

